fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Vaippatarvikkeet > Vauvan kosteuspyyheautomaatit ja -lämmittimet: Vauvan kosteuspyyheautomaatit; Vauvan kosteuspyyhelämmittimet; Kannettavat kosteuspyyheautomaatit
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Αλλαγή πάνας > Διανεμητές & θερμαντήρες μωρομάντηλων: Διανεμητές μωρομάντηλων; Θερμαντήρες μωρομάντηλων; Φορητοί διανομείς καθαρισμού
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Pañales y cuidado del bebé > Dispensadores y calentadores de toallitas para bebés: Dispensadores de toallitas para bebés; Calentadores de toallitas para bebés; Dispensadores de toallitas portátiles
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Change de bébé > Distributeurs et réchauffeurs de lingettes pour bébés: Distributeurs de lingettes pour bébé; Chauffe-lingettes pour bébé; Distributeurs de lingettes portables
ko: 영유아 > 기저귀용품 > 아기 물티슈 디스펜서/워머: 아기 물티슈 디스펜서; 아기 물티슈 워머; 휴대용 물티슈 디스펜서
da: Baby og småbørn > Bleskift > Beholdere og opvarmere til vaskeklude: Beholdere til vaskeklude; Opvarmere til vaskeklude; Bærbare beholdere til vaskeklude
ru: Товары для детей > Пеленание > Диспенсеры и подогреватели для детских салфеток: Диспенсеры для детских салфеток; Подогреватели для детских салфеток; Компактные диспенсеры для салфеток
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Przewijanie > Zasobniki i podgrzewacze na chusteczki dla niemowląt: Zasobniki na chusteczki dla niemowląt; Podgrzewacze do chusteczek dla niemowląt; Przenośne zasobniki na chusteczki dla niemowląt
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Ornamentação > Aquecedores e distribuidores de fraldas para bebé: Dispensadores de toalhitas para bebé; Aquecedores de toalhitas para bebé; Dispensadores de toalhitas portáteis
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Vystymas > Servetėlių kūdikiams dalytuvai ir šildytuvai: Servetėlių kūdikiams dalytuvai; Servetėlių kūdikiams šildytuvai; Nešiojami servetėlių dalytuvai
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Pelenkázás > Baba törlőkendő-adagolók és -melegítők: Baba törlőkendő-adagolók; Baba törlőkendő-melegítők; Hordozható törlőkendő-adagolók
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > การเปลี่ยนผ้าอ้อม > ที่จ่ายและอุ่นกระดาษชำระเปียก: ที่จ่ายกระดาษทิชชู่เปียกสำหรับเด็กอ่อน; ที่อุ่นกระดาษทิชชู่เปียกสำหรับเด็กอ่อน; ที่จ่ายกระดาษทิชชู่เปียกพกพา
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Wickelbedarf > Behälter & Warmhalter für Baby-Reinigungstücher: Babyfeuchttuch-Spender; Babyfeuchttuch-Wärmer; Tragbare Feuchttuchspender
nl: Baby en peuter > Luiermaterialen > Dispensers en warmers voor babydoekjes: Dispensers voor babydoekjes; Warmers voor babydoekjes; Draagbare dispensers voor doekjes
pt-BR: Infantil > Troca de fraldas > Aquecedores e porta-lenços umedecidos: Porta-lenços umedecidos; Aquecedores de lenços umedecidos; Porta-lenços umedecidos portáteis
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 尿布 > 嬰兒濕紙巾盒和濕紙巾加熱器: 嬰兒濕紙巾盒; 嬰兒濕紙巾加熱器; 攜帶型嬰兒濕紙巾盒
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 尿布相关用品 > 婴儿湿巾盒/湿巾加热器: 婴儿湿巾盒; 婴儿湿巾加热器; 便携式湿巾盒
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Articole scutece > Dozatoare și încălzitoare de șervețele pentru copii: Dozatoare de șervețele pentru copii; Încălzitoare de șervețele pentru copii; Dozatoare portabile de șervețele
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Previjanje > Podajalniki in grelniki za otroške robčke: Podajalniki za otroške robčke; Grelniki za vlažilne robčke; Prenosni podajalniki za robčke
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Tã/bỉm > Hộp đựng và giữ ấm khăn giấy: Hộp đựng khăn ướt; Hộp giữ ấm khăn ướt; Hộp đựng khăn ướt di động
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Смяна на пелени > Диспенсъри и нагреватели за бебешки кърпички: Диспенсъри за бебешки кърпички; Нагреватели за бебешки кърпички; Преносими диспенсъри за кърпички
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Pelenaštvo > Držači i grijači maramica za bebe: Držači maramica za bebe; Grijači maramica za bebe; Prijenosni držači maramica za bebe
cs: Děti a kojenci > Přebalování > Zásobníky a ohřívače na dětské ubrousky: Zásobníky na dětské ubrousky; Ohřívače dětských ubrousků; Přenosné zásobníky na ubrousky
sk-SK: Bábätká > Prebaľovanie > Zásobníky a ohrievače detských obrúskov: Zásobníky detských obrúskov; Ohrievače detských obrúskov; Prenosné zásobníky obrúskov
en: Baby & Toddler > Diapering > Baby Wipe Dispensers & Warmers: Baby Wipe Dispensers; Baby Wipe Warmers; Portable Wipe Dispensers
it: Bebè e bimbi > Cambio pannolini > Distributori e riscaldatori di salviettine per bebè: Dispenser di salviette per neonati; Scaldasalviette per neonati; Dispenser portatili di salviette
nb: Baby og barn > Bleieutstyr > Dispensere og varmere for babykluter: Dispensere for babykluter; Varmere for babykluter; Portable klutdispensere
ja: ベビー用品 > おむつ用品 > おしりふき用ディスペンサー・ウォーマー: おしりふき用ディスペンサー; おしりふき用ウォーマー; ポータブルおしりふき用ディスペンサー
sv: Baby och småbarn > Blöjbyte > Hållare och värmare för babyvåtservetter: Babyservettautomater; Babyservettvärmare; Bärbara servettautomater
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Bebek Alt Alma Ürünleri > Bebekler için Islak Mendil Dispanserleri ve Mendil Isıtıcıları: Bebek Mendil Dispenserleri; Bebek Mendil Isıtıcıları; Taşınabilir Mendil Dispenserleri